sv: Hartsform: Block; Kaka; Övrigt
th: รูปแบบยางสน: บล็อก; เค้ก; อื่นๆ
zh-CN: 松香形式: 块; 蛋糕; 其他
sk-SK: Forma kolofónie: Bloky; Koláč; Iné
pt-BR: Formulação da resina: Bloco; Bolo; Outro
pl: Forma kalafonii: Blokada; Placek; Inne
fi: Hartsin olomuoto: Lohko; Kakku; Muu
nb: Rosinform: Blokk; Kake; Annet
ja: 松脂の形態: ブロック; ケーキ; その他
it: Forma della colofonia: Blocco; Tavoletta; Altro
es: Forma de la perrubia: Bloquear; Pastel; Otros
cs: Forma kalafuny: Blok; Dort; Jiné
vi: Dạng nhựa thông: Khối; Bánh ngọt; Khác
da: Harpiksform: Blok; Kage; Andet
de: Kolophoniumform: Block; Kuchen; Sonstiges
ru: Форма канифоли: Блок; Кусок; Другое
nl: Harsvorm: Blok; Cake; Andere
lt-LT: Kanifolijos forma: Kvadratas; Apvalus; Kita
tr: Reçine formu: Blok; Kek; Diğer
el: Μορφή κολοφωνίου: Τετράγωνο; Κέικ; Άλλο
ro-RO: Formă colofoniu: Bloc; Disc; Altele
pt-PT: Forma da resina: Bloco; Bolo; Outro
hu: Gyanta formája: Tömb; Torta; Egyéb
bg-BG: Форма за колофон: Блок; Торта; Други
hr-HR: Oblik kolofonija: Blok; Torta; Ostalo
sl-SI: Oblika kolofonije: Kocka; Kos; Drugo
ko: 송진 형태: 블록; 케이크; 기타
en: Rosin form: Block; Cake; Other
zh-TW: 松香形式: 砌塊; 蛋糕; 其他
fr: Forme de colophane: Bloc; Gâteau; Autre